Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-168
Central mailing room; employees; hours staggered.

The materiel division under the direction of the Director of Administrative Services shall stagger the hours of employees in the central mailing room so that the central mailing room is open until the last mail departs from the Capitol Building.

Laws 1943, c. 218, § 5, p. 716;

R.S.1943, § 81-168;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 20.